Maryland, session 2025, SB0063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reserve] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE study” means a study of the reserves required for future
major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a cooperative housing
corporation that:
[(1)] (I) [Identifies] USING AN ITEMIZED LIST, CLEARLY IDENTIFIES
each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing component of the common elements
and any other components that are:
1. ARE the responsibility of the cooperative housing
corporation to repair and replace; AND
2. IF APPLICABLE, MEET A MINIMUM COST OF REPAIR
OR REPLACEMENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY, THAT IS:
A. REASONABLY BASED ON THE EXPENSES OF THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION; AND
B. NOT A MINOR EXPENSE THAT IS OTHERWISE
ADDRESSED BY THE BUDGET OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION;
[(2)] (II) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
[(3)] (III) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component; [and]
[(4)] (IV) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
(V) STATES THE SQUARE FOOTAGE QUANTITY OR SIZE OF EACH
IDENTIFIED COMPONENT USING THE APPROPRIATE MEASUREMENT, SUCH AS UNIT
AMOUNT, SQUARE FOOTAGE, OR CUBIC FEET.
(3) “UPDATED RESERVE STUDY” MEANS, FOR THE COMMON
ELEMENTS SINCE THE PRIOR RESERVE STUDY WAS COMPLETED WITHIN THE
PREVIOUS 5 YEARS, A STUDY THAT:
(I) ANALYZES ANY WORK PERFORMED;
(II) REVISES REPLACEMENT COST, REMAINING LIFE, AND
USEFUL LIFE ESTIMATES; AND
(III) IDENTIFIES:
1. (II) WORK ANALYZES WORK PERFORMED AND
AMOUNTS SPENT; AND
2. (III) WHETHER IDENTIFIES WHETHER ANY
MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS ARE IN PLACE.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the cooperative housing corporation shall have
an independent reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the first
meeting of the cooperative housing corporation at which the members other than the owner
have a majority of votes in the cooperative housing corporation.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, which shall be updated at least every 5 years thereafter.
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
– 3 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies to a cooperative housing corporation
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) Each reserve study AND UPDATED RESERVE STUDY required under this
section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the cooperative housing
corporation in connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(e) To the extent that a reserve study conducted in accordance with this section
indicates a need to budget for reserves, the budget shall include:
(1) For the capital components, the current estimated:
(i) Replacement cost IF THE ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST IS
GREATER THAN $10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR
UPDATED RESERVE STUDY;
(ii) Remaining life; and
(iii) Useful life;
(2) The amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside for the repair,
replacement, or restoration of capital components as of the beginning of the fiscal year in
which the reserve study is conducted and the amount of the expected contribution to the
reserve fund for the fiscal year;
(3) A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and
accumulation of cash reserves in accordance with this section; and
(4) A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study and
the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.
(f) (1) (i) 1. Subject to PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the governing body of a cooperative housing
corporation shall [provide] DEPOSIT funds to the reserve ACCOUNT in accordance with the
most recent reserve study OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY AND THE FUNDING PLAN
– 5 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE THE LAST DAY
OF EACH FISCAL YEAR and shall review the RESERVES AND THE MOST RECENT
RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED reserve study annually for accuracy TO DETERMINE
WHETHER THERE IS ADEQUATE FUNDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
2. THE ANNUAL REVIEW OF THE RESERVE STUDY FOR
ACCURACY UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH DOES NOT
REQUIRE A RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY IN ADDITION TO THE
RESERVE STUDY REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(ii) If SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF the
most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the governing body shall, within [3]
5 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial reserve study was completed,
attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the initial reserve study IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION MAY DETERMINE BY A TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY VOTE THAT THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AND THE MEMBERS ARE EXPERIENCING A
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP THAT LIMITS THE ABILITY TO FUND RESERVES THAT ARE
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OR (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (III) THROUGH (V) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF A GOVERNING BODY MAKES A FINANCIAL HARDSHIP
DETERMINATION BASED ON THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OR (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
1. THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY
REASONABLY DEVIATE FROM THAT RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT; AND
2. THE FUNDING LEVEL UNDER THAT REQUIREMENT
SHALL BE AT LEAST THE FUNDING AMOUNT NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (G)(3) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY NOT DEVIATE
FROM THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OR (II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION FOR A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 1 FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP DETERMINATION.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
2. THE GOVERNING BODY MAY RENEW A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BY A
TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY VOTE TO EXTEND THE PERIOD THAT A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION MAY DEVIATE FROM THE RESERVE FUNDING
REQUIREMENT BY 1 FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE RENEWAL.
(IV) THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL:
1. MAKE GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO RESOLVE THE
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AND RESUME FUNDING RESERVES AS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OR (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
2. MAINTAIN DETAILED DOCUMENTATION OF THE GOOD
FAITH EFFORTS MADE UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. TREAT THE DOCUMENTS UNDER ITEM 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH AS RECORDS FOR EXAMINATION AND COPYING UNDER § 5–6B–26
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(V) 1. ALL MEMBERS SHALL BE GIVEN REASONABLE NOTICE
IN ADVANCE OF A VOTE ON AN INITIAL OR A RENEWAL OF A FINANCIAL HARDSHIP
DETERMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. A VOTE ON AN INITIAL OR A RENEWAL OF A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE TAKEN ONLY AT A
REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(3) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has the
authority to increase an assessment levied to cover the reserve funding amount required
under this section, notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws,
or proprietary lease restricting assessment increases or capping the assessment that may
be levied in a fiscal year.
(G) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH A PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP A FUNDING PLAN TO DETERMINE
HOW TO FULLY FUND THE RESERVES NECESSARY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IN DEVELOPING THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER SELECT ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
METHODS TO ACHIEVE THE RESERVE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) THE COMPONENT OR FULL FUNDING METHOD;
– 7 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) THE CASH FLOW METHOD;
(III) THE BASELINE FUNDING METHOD;
(IV) THE THRESHOLD CASH FLOW METHOD; AND OR
(V) OTHER FUNDING METHODS ACCEPTED BY ANY OTHER
FUNDING METHOD CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING
PRINCIPLES.
(3) A FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PRIORITIZE ADEQUATE AMOUNTS FOR REPAIR AND REPLACEMENT OF COMMON
ELEMENTS OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION THAT ARE NECESSARY
FOR:
(I) THE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELL–BEING OF THE MEMBERS
OCCUPANTS;
(II) ENSURING STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY, SUCH AS ROOFING
REPLACEMENTS AND MAINTAINING STRUCTURAL SYSTEMS; AND
(III) ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONING, SUCH AS PLUMBING, SEWER,
HEATING, COOLING, AND ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER ESSENTIAL OR CRITICAL PURPOSE, AS
DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY.
(4) RESERVES MAY NOT BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED IN THE FUNDING PLAN.
(4) RESERVES MAY BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED IN THE FUNDING PLAN IF THE FUNDS ARE REPAID TO THE RESERVE FUND
WITHIN 5 YEARS AFTER THEIR USE.
(5) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL REVIEW PROGRESS TOWARD
COMPLIANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AT
EACH ANNUAL MEETING OF THE GOVERNING BODY.
Article – Real Property
11–109.2.
(b) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
(1) Income;
(2) Administration;
(3) Maintenance;
(4) Utilities;
(5) General expenses;
(6) Reserves, INCLUDING REPLACEMENT COSTS IF THE ESTIMATED
REPLACEMENT COST IS GREATER THAN $10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST
RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY; and
(7) Capital items.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this subsection
AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER § 11–109.4(F) OF THIS TITLE,
the reserves provided for in the annual budget under subsection (b) of this section for a
residential condominium shall [be]:
(I) BE the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve
study OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY completed under § 11–109.4 of this title; AND
(II) BE DEPOSITED IN THE RESERVE ACCOUNT ON OR BEFORE
THE LAST DAY OF EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(2) If SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF the most
recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the governing body shall, within [3] 5
fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial reserve study was completed, attain
the annual reserve funding level recommended in the initial reserve study IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER § 11–109.4(F) OF THIS TITLE.
(3) (I) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM
MAY DETERMINE BY A TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY VOTE THAT THE CONDOMINIUM AND
THE UNIT OWNERS ARE EXPERIENCING A FINANCIAL HARDSHIP THAT LIMITS THE
ABILITY TO FUND RESERVES THAT ARE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (III) THROUGH (V) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF A GOVERNING BODY MAKES A FINANCIAL HARDSHIP
DETERMINATION BASED ON THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
– 9 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. THE CONDOMINIUM MAY REASONABLY DEVIATE
FROM THAT RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT; AND
2. THE FUNDING LEVEL UNDER THAT REQUIREMENT
SHALL BE AT LEAST THE FUNDING AMOUNT NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED UNDER § 11–109.4(F)(3) OF THIS TITLE.
(III) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM MAY NOT DEVIATE FROM THE
RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
FOR A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 1 FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION.
2. THE GOVERNING BODY MAY RENEW A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BY A
TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY VOTE TO EXTEND THE PERIOD THAT A RESIDENTIAL
CONDOMINIUM MAY DEVIATE FROM THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT BY 1
FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE RENEWAL.
(IV) THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL:
1. MAKE GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO RESOLVE THE
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AND RESUME FUNDING RESERVES AS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
2. MAINTAIN DETAILED DOCUMENTATION OF THE GOOD
FAITH EFFORTS MADE UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. TREAT THE DOCUMENTS UNDER ITEM 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH AS RECORDS AVAILABLE FOR EXAMINATION AND COPYING UNDER
§ 11–116 OF THIS TITLE.
(V) 1. ALL UNIT OWNERS SHALL BE GIVEN REASONABLE
NOTICE IN ADVANCE OF A VOTE ON AN INITIAL OR A RENEWAL OF A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. A VOTE ON AN INITIAL OR A RENEWAL OF A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE TAKEN ONLY AT A
REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(4) (I) A THE GOVERNING BODY OF A RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM
SHALL ANNUALLY REVIEW THE RESERVE STUDY ANNUALLY FOR ACCURACY
RESERVES AND THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
TO DETERMINE WHETHER THERE IS ADEQUATE FUNDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
FUNDING PLAN REQUIRED UNDER § 11–109.4(F) OF THIS TITLE.
(II) THE ANNUAL REVIEW OF THE RESERVE STUDY FOR
ACCURACY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT REQUIRE A RESERVE STUDY OR
UPDATED RESERVE STUDY IN ADDITION TO THE RESERVE STUDY REQUIREMENTS
UNDER § 11–109.4 OF THIS TITLE.
11–109.4.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reserve] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE study” means a study of the reserves required for future
major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a condominium that:
[(1)] (I) [Identifies] USING AN ITEMIZED LIST, IDENTIFIES each
structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing component of the common elements and
any other components that are:
1. ARE the responsibility of the council of unit owners to
repair and replace; AND
2. IF APPLICABLE, MEET A MINIMUM COST OF REPAIR
OR REPLACEMENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY, THAT IS:
A. REASONABLY BASED ON THE EXPENSES OF THE
CONDOMINIUM; AND
B. NOT A MINOR EXPENSE THAT IS OTHERWISE
ADDRESSED BY THE BUDGET OF THE CONDOMINIUM;
[(2)] (II) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
[(3)] (III) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component; [and]
[(4)] (IV) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) STATES THE SQUARE FOOTAGE QUANTITY OR SIZE OF EACH
IDENTIFIED COMPONENT USING THE APPROPRIATE MEASUREMENT, SUCH AS UNIT
AMOUNT, SQUARE FOOTAGE, OR CUBIC FEET.
(3) “UPDATED RESERVE STUDY” MEANS, FOR THE COMMON
ELEMENTS SINCE THE PRIOR RESERVE STUDY WAS COMPLETED WITHIN THE
PREVIOUS 5 YEARS, A STUDY THAT:
(I) ANALYZES ANY WORK PERFORMED;
(II) REVISES REPLACEMENT COST, REMAINING LIFE, AND
USEFUL LIFE ESTIMATES; AND
(III) IDENTIFIES:
1. (II) WORK ANALYZES WORK PERFORMED AND
AMOUNTS SPENT; AND
2. (III) WHETHER IDENTIFIES WHETHER ANY
MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS ARE IN PLACE.
(b) This section applies only to a residential condominium.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a condominium established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under § 11–109(c)(16) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in any
county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study AND UPDATED RESERVE STUDY required under this
section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
– 13 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the condominium in connection
with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(F) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A CONDOMINIUM SHALL, IN
CONSULTATION WITH A PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, DEVELOP A FUNDING PLAN TO DETERMINE HOW TO FULLY FUND THE
RESERVES NECESSARY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IN DEVELOPING THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER SELECT ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
METHODS TO ACHIEVE THE RESERVE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) THE COMPONENT OR FULL FUNDING METHOD;
(II) THE CASH FLOW METHOD;
(III) THE BASELINE FUNDING METHOD;
(IV) THE THRESHOLD CASH FLOW METHOD; AND OR
(V) OTHER FUNDING METHODS ACCEPTED BY ANY OTHER
FUNDING METHOD CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING
PRINCIPLES.
(3) A FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PRIORITIZE ADEQUATE AMOUNTS FOR REPAIR AND REPLACEMENT OF COMMON
ELEMENTS OF THE CONDOMINIUM THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR:
(I) THE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELL–BEING OF THE MEMBERS
OCCUPANTS;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
(II) ENSURING STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY, SUCH AS ROOFING
REPLACEMENTS AND MAINTAINING STRUCTURAL SYSTEMS; AND
(III) ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONING, SUCH AS PLUMBING, SEWER,
HEATING, COOLING, AND ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER ESSENTIAL OR CRITICAL PURPOSE, AS
DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY.
(4) RESERVES MAY NOT BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED IN THE FUNDING PLAN.
(4) RESERVES MAY BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED IN THE FUNDING PLAN IF THE FUNDS ARE REPAID TO THE RESERVE FUND
WITHIN 5 YEARS AFTER THEIR USE.
(5) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL REVIEW PROGRESS TOWARD
COMPLIANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AT
EACH ANNUAL MEETING OF THE GOVERNING BODY.
11B–112.2.
(c) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
(1) Income;
(2) Administration;
(3) Maintenance;
(4) Utilities;
(5) General expenses;
(6) Reserves, INCLUDING REPLACEMENT COSTS IF THE ESTIMATED
REPLACEMENT COST IS GREATER THAN $10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST
RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY; and
(7) Capital expenses.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this subsection
AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER § 11B–112.3(F) OF THIS
TITLE, reserves provided for in the annual budget under subsection (c) of this section shall
[be]:
– 15 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) BE the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve
study OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY completed under § 11B–112.3 of this title; AND
(II) BE DEPOSITED IN THE RESERVE ACCOUNT ON OR BEFORE
THE LAST DAY OF EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(2) If SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF the most
recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the governing body shall, within [3] 5
fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial reserve study was completed, attain
the annual reserve funding level recommended in the initial reserve study IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER § 11B–112.3(F) OF THIS TITLE.
(3) (I) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
MAY DETERMINE BY A TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY VOTE THAT THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION AND THE LOT OWNERS ARE EXPERIENCING A FINANCIAL HARDSHIP
THAT LIMITS THE ABILITY TO FUND RESERVES THAT ARE REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (III) THROUGH (V) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF A GOVERNING BODY MAKES A FINANCIAL HARDSHIP
DETERMINATION BASED ON THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
1. THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY REASONABLY
DEVIATE FROM THAT RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT; AND
2. THE FUNDING LEVEL UNDER THAT REQUIREMENT
SHALL BE AT LEAST THE FUNDING AMOUNT NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED UNDER § 11B–112.3(F)(3) OF THIS TITLE.
(III) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT DEVIATE FROM THE
RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
FOR A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 1 FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION.
2. THE GOVERNING BODY MAY RENEW A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BY A
TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY VOTE TO EXTEND THE PERIOD THAT A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION MAY DEVIATE FROM THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT BY 1
FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE RENEWAL.
(IV) THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
1. MAKE GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO RESOLVE THE
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AND RESUME FUNDING RESERVES AS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
2. MAINTAIN DETAILED DOCUMENTATION OF THE GOOD
FAITH EFFORTS MADE UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. TREAT THE DOCUMENTS UNDER ITEM 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH AS RECORDS FOR EXAMINATION AND COPYING UNDER § 11B–112
OF THIS TITLE.
(V) 1. ALL LOT OWNERS SHALL BE GIVEN REASONABLE
NOTICE IN ADVANCE OF A VOTE ON AN INITIAL OR A RENEWAL OF A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. A VOTE ON AN INITIAL OR A RENEWAL OF A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP DETERMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY ONLY BE TAKEN AT A
REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(4) (I) A THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
SHALL ANNUALLY REVIEW THE RESERVE STUDY ANNUALLY FOR ACCURACY
RESERVES AND THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY
TO DETERMINE WHETHER THERE IS ADEQUATE FUNDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
FUNDING PLAN REQUIRED UNDER § 11B–112.3(F) OF THIS TITLE.
(II) THE ANNUAL REVIEW OF THE RESERVE STUDY FOR
ACCURACY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT REQUIRE A RESERVE STUDY OR
UPDATED RESERVE STUDY IN ADDITION TO THE RESERVE STUDY REQUIREMENTS
UNDER § 11B–112.3 OF THIS TITLE.
11B–112.3.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reserve] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE study” means a study of the reserves required for future
major repairs and replacement of the common areas of a homeowners association that:
[(1)] (I) [Identifies] USING AN ITEMIZED LIST, IDENTIFIES each
structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing component of the common areas and any
other components that are:
– 17 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. ARE the responsibility of the homeowners association to
repair and replace; AND
2. IF APPLICABLE, MEET A MINIMUM COST OF REPAIR
OR REPLACEMENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY, THAT IS:
A. REASONABLY BASED ON THE EXPENSES OF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION; AND
B. NOT A MINOR EXPENSE THAT IS OTHERWISE
ADDRESSED BY THE BUDGET OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
[(2)] (II) States the estimated remaining useful life of each identified
component;
[(3)] (III) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component; [and]
[(4)] (IV) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement; AND
(V) STATES THE SQUARE FOOTAGE QUANTITY OR SIZE OF EACH
IDENTIFIED COMPONENT USING THE APPROPRIATE MEASUREMENT, SUCH AS UNIT
AMOUNT, SQUARE FOOTAGE, OR CUBIC FEET.
(3) “UPDATED RESERVE STUDY” MEANS, FOR THE COMMON
ELEMENTS AREAS SINCE THE PRIOR RESERVE STUDY WAS COMPLETED WITHIN THE
PREVIOUS 5 YEARS, A STUDY THAT:
(I) ANALYZES ANY WORK PERFORMED;
(II) REVISES REPLACEMENT COST, REMAINING LIFE, AND
USEFUL LIFE ESTIMATES; AND
(III) IDENTIFIES:
1. (II) WORK ANALYZES WORK PERFORMED AND
AMOUNTS SPENT; AND
2. (III) WHETHER IDENTIFIES WHETHER ANY
MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS ARE IN PLACE.
(b) (1) This section applies only to a homeowners association:
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
(i) That has responsibility under its declaration for maintaining and
repairing common areas; and
(ii) For which the total initial purchase and installation REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT costs for all components identified in subsection [(a)(1)] (A) of this section
is at least $10,000.
(2) This section does not apply to a homeowners association that issues
bonds for the purpose of meeting capital expenditures.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a homeowners association established
in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the homeowners association shall have an
independent reserve study completed not more than 90 calendar days and not less than 30
calendar days before the meeting of the homeowners association required under §
11B–106.1(a) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
– 19 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study AND UPDATED RESERVE STUDY required under this
section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any lot owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the homeowners association in
connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 518
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
lot owners.
(F) (1) A THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH A PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1)
OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP A FUNDING PLAN TO DETERMINE HOW TO FULLY FUND
THE RESERVES NECESSARY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IN DEVELOPING THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE HOMEOWNERS GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER SELECT ONE OF THE
FOLLOWING METHODS TO ACHIEVE THE RESERVE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) THE COMPONENT OR FULL FUNDING METHOD;
(II) THE CASH FLOW METHOD;
(III) THE BASELINE FUNDING METHOD;
(IV) THE THRESHOLD CASH FLOW METHOD; AND OR
(V) OTHER FUNDING METHODS ANY OTHER FUNDING METHOD
CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES.
(3) A FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PRIORITIZE ADEQUATE AMOUNTS FOR REPAIR AND REPLACEMENT OF COMMON
ELEMENTS AREAS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR:
(I) THE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELL–BEING OF THE MEMBERS
OCCUPANTS;
(II) ENSURING STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY, SUCH AS ROOFING
REPLACEMENTS AND MAINTAINING STRUCTURAL SYSTEMS; AND
(III) ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONING, SUCH AS PLUMBING, SEWER,
HEATING, COOLING, AND ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER ESSENTIAL OR CRITICAL PURPOSE, AS
DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY.
(4) RESERVES MAY NOT BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED IN THE FUNDING PLAN.
– 21 –

Ch. 518 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) RESERVES MAY BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED IN THE FUNDING PLAN IF THE FUNDS ARE REPAID TO THE RESERVE FUND
WITHIN 5 YEARS AFTER THEIR USE.
(5) A GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL
REVIEW PROGRESS TOWARD COMPLIANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AT EACH ANNUAL MEETING OF THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 22 –